src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON C_LOHHEE_PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** redirects to  C_TAHHEE, but adds NomAg 
+N+NomAg: X_TAHHEE_PL ; 
+N+NomAg+Cmp/PlGen:%>i3 Rhash ; 
!+N+NomAg+Pl+Gen:^WG%>id CPXsuff ;  ! 
!+N+NomAg+Pl+Acc:^WG%>id CPXsuff ;  ! 
!+N+NomAg+Pl+Com:^WG%>id CPXsuffCOM ;  ! 
+N+NomAg+Pl+Gen:%>i3d CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+NomAg+Pl+Acc:%>i3d CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+NomAg+Pl+Ill:%>i3d CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+NomAg+Pl+Com:%>i3d CPXsuffCOM ;  ! 
+N+NomAg+Pl+Loc:%>i3n CPXsuff ;  ! 
 +N+NomAg+Der1+Der/Dimin: 3OPPUS_PL ; !elleežijd  elleežii 

 
LEXICON C_TAHHEE !!≈ * **@CODE@** STEM IS: myersse
C_TAHHEE_SG ; 
C_TAHHEE_PL ; 
 
LEXICON C_TAHHEE_SG !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+N: X_TAHHEE_SG ; 
+N+Cmp/SgNom:^SV^SLEN Rhash ; 
+N+Cmp/SgGen:^SV^SLEN Rhash ; 
+N+Sg+Nom:^EA VPXsuff12nom ;  ! 
+N+Sg+Gen:^EA VPXsuff12 ;  ! 
+N+Sg+Acc:^EA VPXsuff12 ;  ! 
+N+Sg+Nom: VPXsuff3 ;  ! 
+N+Sg+Gen: VPXsuff3 ;  ! 
+N+Sg+Acc: VPXsuff3 ;  ! 
+N+Sg+Ill:^EA%>s CPXsuff ;       ! tahheesis ... ^EA?? 
+N+Sg+Loc:^SV^SLEN%>st CPXsuff ; ! tahheestân
+N+Sg+Com:%>i3n CPXsuff ;        ! tahheinân 
+N:^SV^SLEN%> Nom_DER ; 
+N+NomAg+Der1+Der/Dimin: 3OPPUS_SG ; !elleežijd  elleežii 
 
LEXICON C_TAHHEE_PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+N: X_TAHHEE_PL ; 
+N+Pl+Gen:^SV^SLEN^WG%>id CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Pl+Acc:^SV^SLEN^WG%>id CPXsuff ;  ! 
!+N+Pl+Com:^WG%>id CPXsuffCOM ;  ! 
+N:^SV^SLEN%> Nom_DER ; 
+N+Pl+Gen:%>i3d CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Pl+Acc:%>i3d CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Pl+Ill:%>i3d CPXsuff ;            ! tahheidis 
+N+Pl+Com:%>i3d CPXsuffCOM ;         ! tahheidânguin
+N+Pl+Loc:%>i3n CPXsuff ;            ! tahheinân 
+N+Cmp/SgNom:^SV^SLEN Rhash ; 
 +N+NomAg+Der1+Der/Dimin: 3OPPUS_PL ; !elleežijd  elleežii 

LEXICON X_TAHHEE !!≈ * **@CODE@** ee-final contract, -ei instead of -ij not-nomen-agentis 
X_TAHHEE_SG ; 
X_TAHHEE_PL ; 
 
LEXICON X_TAHHEE_SG !!≈ * **@CODE@** ee-final contract, -ei instead of -ij 
+Sg+Nom:^SV^SLEN FLAG_CTAHHEE ;             ! tahhee 
+Sg+Gen:^SV^SLEN FLAG_CTAHHEE ;             ! tahhee 
+Sg+Acc:^SV^SLEN FLAG_CTAHHEE ;             ! tahhee 
+Sg+Ill:%>i3 FLAG_CTAHHEE ;                 ! tahhei 
+Sg+Loc:%>st FLAG_CTAHHEE ;                 ! tahhest ! stem e > 0 
+Sg+Com:%>i3n FLAG_CTAHHEE ;                ! tahhein 
+Sg+Abe:^SV^SLEN%>ttáá FLAG_CTAHHEE ;       ! tahheettáá 
+Ess:%>n        FLAG_CTAHHEE ;              ! tahhen 
+Par:%>d        FLAG_CTAHHEE ;              ! tahhed 
 
LEXICON X_TAHHEE_PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** ee-final contract, plural forms 
+Pl+Nom:^SV^SLEN%>h FLAG_CTAHHEE ;          ! tahheeh 
+Pl+Gen:%>i3 FLAG_CTAHHEE ;                 ! tahhei 
+Pl+Acc:%>i3d FLAG_CTAHHEE ;                ! tahheid 
+Pl+Ill:%>i3d FLAG_CTAHHEE ;                ! tahheid 
+Pl+Loc:%>i3n FLAG_CTAHHEE ;                ! tahhein 
+Pl+Com:%>i3guin FLAG_CTAHHEE ;             ! tahheiguin 
+Pl+Com+Use/NG:%>i3gijn FLAG_CTAHHEE ;      ! tahheiguin 
+Pl+Abe:%>i3ttáá FLAG_CTAHHEE ;             ! tahheittáá 
 
 
!! ## Comitative plural variation 
 
LEXICON GUIN  !!≈ * **@CODE@** is here to give -guin and the Use/NG -gijn. 
       :%>guin K ; 
+Use/NG:%>gijn K ; 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
!! # Derivation lexica 
! ================================= 
 
!! TODO: Move derivation lexica here 

!! ## Diminutive derivations _DIM
! LEXICON 2_DIM !!≈ * ''@CODE@'' kissá + Der/Dim + this lexicon 
! +N+Sg+Nom:^RLEN%>š K ;                         ! 
! +N+Sg+Gen:^SV^SLEN K ;                         ! 
! +N+Sg+Acc:^SV^SLEN K ;                        ! 
! +N+Sg+Loc:^SV^SLEN%>st K ;                ! 
! +N+Sg+Ill:^CSHž%>ân K ;                    ! 
! +N+Ess:^SVž^SLEN^SVLOW%>in K ;        ! 
! +N+Par:^SVž^SLEN^SVLOW%>id K ;         ! 
! +N+Sg+Com:%>in K ;                                 ! 
! +N+Sg+Abe:^SV^SLEN%>ttáá K ;         ! 
! +N: X_SVSLENh_PL ; 
! +N+Cmp/SgNom:^SVš^SLEN%>  Rhash ; 
! +N+Cmp/SgGen:^SV^SLEN%>  Rhash ; 
! +N+Cmp/PlGen:%>i  Rhash ; 
 

!! ### 2 syllabic stems

!! #### final â


LEXICON 2JUUHA_SG_DIM !!≈ * **@CODE@** (a lexicon to create deminutives; Not for lexicalised words already being in deminutive) 
 
+N+Sg+Nom:^WG^RLEN%>š K ; 
!+N+Sg+Gen:i^WG^CLEN%>i K ;     ! twolc: â:0 ovdal i. 
+N+Sg+Gen:i5^WG^CLEN%>i K ;     ! juvvii 
+N+Sg+Acc:i5^WG^CLEN%>i K ;     ! juvvii 
+N+Sg+Ill:â^WG%>žân K ;         ! juvâžân 
+N+Sg+Loc:i5^WG^CLEN%>ist K ;   ! juvviist 
+N+Sg+Com:i5^WG^CLEN%>jn K ;     ! juvvijn  i5?
+N+Sg+Abe:i5^WG^CLEN%>ittáá K ; ! juvviittáá 
+N+Cmp/SgNom:â^WG%>š Rhash ; 
+N+Cmp/SgGen:âi5^RVSH%>i Rhash ; 
+N+Ess:â^WG%>žin K ; 
+N+Par:â^WG%>žid K ; 
 
LEXICON 2JUUHA_PL_DIM
2ALGA_PL_DIM ; ! XXX TODO čále leksikona

LEXICON 2ALGA_SG_DIM  !!≈ * **@CODE@** a^RVlgâ done witout FVD, both ways work
+N+Sg+Nom:^WG^RLEN%>š K ;         ! aalgâš  ^FVD^WG^RLEN%>š K ; 
+N+Cmp/SgNom:^WG^RLEN%>š  Rhash ; 
+N+Cmp/SgGen:i^WG%>i5  Rhash ; ! gen: aalgâ gdim. algii â FVD %> ii 
+N+Sg+Gen:i^WG^CLEN%>i5 K ;         ! algii, merhii
+N+Sg+Acc:i^WG^CLEN%>i5 K ;         ! la^RVhc^RCâi^WG^CLEN>i 
+N+Sg+Ill:ž^WG%>ân K ;         ! algâ 
+N+Sg+Loc:i^WG^CLEN%>ist K ;        ! la^RVhc^RCâi^WG^CLEN>ist 
+N+Sg+Com:i^WG^CLEN%>in K ;         ! OK 
+N+Sg+Abe:i^WG^CLEN%>i5ttáá K ; 
+N+Ess:^WGž%>in K ; 
+N+Par:^WGž%>id K ; 
!+N+Cmp/SgGen:^SV^SLEN  Rhash ; ! old version
 
LEXICON 2ALGA_PL_DIM  !!≈ * **@CODE@**  a^RVlgâ
+N+Pl+Nom:i^WG^CLEN%>ih K ; 
+N+Pl+Gen:i^WG^CLEN%>j K ; 
+N+Cmp/PlGen:i^WG^CLEN%>j  Rhash ; 
+N+Pl+Acc:i^WG^CLEN%>id K ; 
+N+Pl+Ill:i^WG^CLEN%>id K ; 
+N+Pl+Loc:i^WG^CLEN%>in K ; 
+N+Pl+Com:i^WG^CLEN%>j GUIN ; 
+N+Pl+Abe:i^WG^CLEN%>ittáá K ; 


 
LEXICON 2KIELA_SG_DIM 
+N+Sg+Nom:^WG^RLEN%>š K ; 
+N+Sg+Gen:^FVD^WG%>i5i5 K ; 
+N+Sg+Acc:^FVD^WG%>i5i5 K ; 
+N+Sg+Ill:^WG%>žân K ; 
+N+Sg+Loc:^FVD^WG%>iist K ; 
+N+Sg+Com:^FVD^WG%>ijn K ; 
+N+Sg+Abe:^FVD^WG%>iittáá K ; 
+N+Ess:%>žin K ; 
+N+Par:%>žid K ; 

LEXICON 2KIELA_PL_DIM
+N+Pl+Nom:^FVD^WG%>iih K ; 
+N+Pl+Gen:^FVD^WG%>ij K ; 
+N+Pl+Acc:^FVD^WG%>ijd K ; 
+N+Pl+Ill:^FVD^WG%>ijd K ; 
+N+Pl+Loc:^FVD^WG%>ijn K ; 
+N+Pl+Com:^FVD^WG%>ij GUIN ; 
+N+Pl+Abe:^FVD^WG%>ijttáá K ; 
 
 


!! #### final á

LEXICON 2CAANA_SG_DIM
+N+Sg+Nom:^SV^WG^RLEN^SLEN%>š K ;      ! má^RVn^RCá čáánááš
+N+Sg+Gen:^SV^WG^RLEN^SLEN K ;         ! čáánáá
+N+Sg+Acc:^SV^WG^RLEN^SLEN K ;         ! 
+N+Sg+Ill:^WG%>žân K ;                 ! čánážân
+N+Sg+Loc:^SV^WG^VHIGH^RLEN^SLEN%>st K ;    ! čáánáást
+N+Sg+Com:^SV^WG^VHIGH^RLEN^SLEN%>in K ;    ! čáánááin
+N+Sg+Abe:^SV^WG^VHIGH^RLEN^SLEN%>ttáá K ;       ! čáánááttáá
+N+Ess:^WG%>žin K ;                    ! čánážin 
+N+Par:^WG%>žid K ;                    ! čánážid

LEXICON 2CAANA_PL_DIM 
+N+Pl+Nom:^SV^WG^VHIGH^RLEN^SLEN%>h K ;  ! 
+N+Pl+Gen:^SV^WG^VHIGH^RLEN^SLEN%>i K ;          ! 
+N+Pl+Acc:^SV^WG^VHIGH^RLEN^SLEN%>id K ;         ! 
+N+Pl+Ill:^SV^WG^VHIGH^RLEN^SLEN%>id K ;         ! 
+N+Pl+Loc:^SV^WG^VHIGH^RLEN^SLEN%>in K ;         ! 
+N+Pl+Com:^SV^WG^VHIGH^RLEN^SLEN%>i GUIN ;                 ! 
+N+Pl+Abe:^SV^WG^VHIGH^RLEN^SLEN%>ittáá K ;      ! 

LEXICON 2FADDA_DIM 
+N: FADDA_SG_DIM ; 
+N: 2FADDA_PL_DIM ; 
 
LEXICON FADDA_SG_DIM  !!≈ * **@CODE@** fá^RVddá 
+Sg+Nom:^WG^RLEN%>š K ; !   ^FVD^WG^RLEN%>š K ; 
+Cmp/SgNom:^WG^RLEN%>š  Rhash ; 
+Cmp/SgGen:^SV^WG^CLEN^SLEN  Rhash ; ! 
+Cmp/PlGen:i  Rhash ; 
+Sg+Gen:^SV^WG^CLEN^SLEN K ; 
+Sg+Acc:^SV^WG^CLEN^SLEN K ; 
+Sg+Ill:ž^WG%>ân K ; ! 
+Sg+Loc:^SV^WG^CLEN^SLEN%>st K ; !la^RVhc^RCâi^WG^CLEN>ist 
+Sg+Com:^SV^WG^CLEN^SLEN%>in K ; ! OK 
+Sg+Abe:^SV^WG^CLEN^SLEN%>ittáá K ; 
+Ess:^WGž%>in K ; 
+Par:^WGž%>id K ; 
 
LEXICON 2FADDA_PL_DIM  !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+Pl+Nom:á%>h K ; 
+Pl+Gen:á%>i K ; 
+Pl+Acc:á%>id K ; 
+Pl+Ill:á%>id K ; 
+Pl+Loc:á%>in K ; 
+Pl+Com:^FVD%>ij GUIN ; 
+Pl+Abe:i%>ttáá K ; 
 
 
LEXICON 2KISSA_DIM !!≈ * **@CODE@** 

2KISSA_SG_DIM ;
2KISSA_PL_DIM ;

LEXICON 2KISSA_SG_DIM
+N+Sg+Nom:^SV^WG^CLEN^SLEN%>š K ;           ! 
+N+Sg+Gen:^SV^WG^CLEN^VHIGH^SLEN K ;        ! 
+N+Sg+Acc:^SV^WG^CLEN^VHIGH^SLEN K ;        ! 
+N+Sg+Ill:^EA^WG%>žân K ;                   ! 
+N+Sg+Loc:^SV^WG^CLEN^VHIGH^SLEN%>st K ;    ! 
+N+Sg+Com:^WG^CLEN^VHIGH%>in K ;            ! 
+N+Sg+Abe:^SV^WG^CLEN^VHIGH^SLEN%>ttáá K ;  ! 
+N+Ess:^WG%>žin K ;                         ! 
+N+Par:^WG%>žid K ;                         ! 
