src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounPx !!≈ * **@CODE@** here we put all normal nouns, as before
evnijoddee+Sem/Dummytag:evni#jodde C_TAHHEE "hämähäkinverkko" ;
späldee+Sem/Dummytag:spälde C_TAHHEE "" ;
uđđâässee+Sem/Hum:uđđâ#ässe C_TAHHEE "uudisasukas" ;
sundešliäđgoo+Sem/Dummytag:sunde#šliäđgo C_TAHHEE "" ;
juátkoo+Sem/Dummytag:juátko C_TAHHEE "" ;
pissoo+Sem/Dummytag:pisso C_TAHHEE "" ;
lieveeh+Sem/Dummytag:lieve C_TAHHEE_PL "" ;
rännee+Sem/Dummytag:ränne C_TAHHEE "jäniksen polku (lumella)" ;
koldee+Sem/Hum:kolde C_TAHHEE "nuottaaja" ;
muttee+Sem/Hum:mutte C_TAHHEE "muuntaja" ;
kärbee+Sem/Hum:kärbe C_TAHHEE "karkottaja" ;
lappâdjottee+Sem/Hum:lappâd#jotte C_TAHHEE "ohikulkija" ;
náguttellee+Err/Orth+Sem/Hum:náguttâlle C_TAHHEE "väittelijä" ;
kárbáinjottee+Sem/Hum:kárbáin#jotte C_TAHHEE "veneilijä" ;
jurssee+Sem/Dummytag:jursse C_TAHHEE "jyrsijä" ;
oovdâstjottee+Sem/Hum:oovdâst#jotte C_TAHHEE "edelläkävijä" ;
čyeldee+Sem/Hum:čyelde C_TAHHEE "paulankutoja" ;
kompâleššee+Sem/Dummytag:kompâlešše C_TAHHEE "veitikka" ;
kulloo+Sem/Dummytag:kullo C_TAHHEE "kuulemma" ;
monnjâjorree+Sem/Dummytag:monnjâ#jorre C_TAHHEE "vauhtipyörä" ;
jotolâhriggee+Sem/Dummytag:jotolâh#rigge C_TAHHEE "liikenneympyrä" ;
jieŋâkuáldee+Sem/Dummytag:jieŋâ#kuálde C_TAHHEE "ajelehtiva jäälautta" ;
kááijumpuárree+Sem/Dummytag:kááijum#puárre C_TAHHEE "pelastuslautta" ;
čoođâčyevvee+Sem/Dummytag:čoođâ#čyevve C_TAHHEE "läpinäkyvä" ;
čođâldittee+Sem/Dummytag:čođâlditte C_TAHHEE "lävistäjä" ;
tejâpäinee+Sem/Dummytag:tejâ#päine C_TAHHEE "nurmitädyke" ;
kildeeh+Sem/Dummytag:kilde C_TAHHEE_PL "askarteluhile" ;
kolmâkäldee+Sem/Dummytag:kolmâ#kälde C_TAHHEE "hete" ;
juurdâsillee+Sem/Dummytag:juurdâ#sille C_TAHHEE "ideariihi" ;
emipoccee+Sem/Dummytag:emi#pocce C_TAHHEE "siiteputki" ;
liegâdâspoccee+Sem/Dummytag:liegâdâs#pocce C_TAHHEE "lämpöputki" ;
kärree+Sem/Dummytag:kärre C_TAHHEE "korpi" ;
časkee+Sem/Dummytag:časke C_TAHHEE "iskuri" ;
pettee+Sem/Hum:pette C_TAHHEE "petturi" ;
keđginjuálloo+Sem/Dummytag:keđgi#njuállo C_TAHHEE "kivennuoliainen" ;
ovdâkessee+Sem/Dummytag:ovdâ#kesse C_TAHHEE "etuvetoinen" ;
ovdâlasâsikkoo+Sem/Dummytag:ovdâlasâ#sikko C_TAHHEE "tuulilasinpyyhin" ;
oommânáimunjammee+Sem/Dummytag:oommân#áimu#njamme C_TAHHEE "liesituuletin" ;
ááimuvorâsmittee+Sem/Dummytag:ááimuvorâsmitte C_TAHHEE "ilmanraikastin" ;
šoliskällee+Sem/Dummytag:šolis#källe C_TAHHEE "silokallio" ;
peljiriggee+Sem/Dummytag:pelji#rigge C_TAHHEE "korvarengas" ;
äpisodâsteijeeh+Sem/Dummytag:äpi#sodâstei4je C_TAHHEE_PL "ulappaliitäjät" ;
manemušpoccee+Sem/Dummytag:manemuš#pocce C_TAHHEE "munuaistiehyt" ;
jorreeh+Sem/Dummytag:jorre C_TAHHEE_PL "kärryt" ;
čuoigâmlättee+Sem/Dummytag:čuoigâm#lätte C_TAHHEE "hiihtolatu" ;
kerrisrähtee+Sem/Hum:kerris#rähte C_TAHHEE ;
šnjirgooh+Sem/Dummytag:šnjirgo C_TAHHEE_PL ;
sijvuu+Sem/Dummytag:sijvu C_TAHHEE "hiljainen" ; ! Biblical
ildee+Sem/Furn:ilde C_TAHHEE "hylly" ;	!¢ildein, ildest, ildei, ildee tags_via_apertium
kaccuu+Sem/Ani:kaccu C_TAHHEE "järvikatka" ;
kissáoppuu+Sem/Ani-bird:kissá#oppu C_TAHHEE "kissapöllö" ;
käldee+Sem/Plc_Txt:kälde C_TAHHEE "avanto" ;	!¢käldein, käldest, käldei, käldee tags_via_apertium
lättee+Sem/Route:lätte C_TAHHEE "lattia" ;	!¢lättein, lättest, lättei, lättee tags_via_apertium
minervaoppuu+Sem/Ani-bird:minerva#oppu C_TAHHEE "minervanpöllö" ;
pannee+Sem/Hum:panne C_TAHHEE "kehrääjä" ;	!¢pannein, pannest, pannei, pannee tags_via_apertium
pähtipäinee+Sem/Plant:pähti#päine C_TAHHEE "varputädyke" ;
ruopsisluhtee+Sem/Plant:ruopsis#luhte C_TAHHEE "pullosara" ;
ränisluhtee+Sem/Plant:ränis#luhte C_TAHHEE "harmaasara" ;
stuorrâcivkkee+Sem/Ani-bird:stuorrâ#civkke C_TAHHEE "isokirvinen" ;
suormâluhtee+Sem/Plant:suormâ#luhte C_TAHHEE "sormisara" ;
taažâluhtee+Sem/Plant:taažâ#luhte C_TAHHEE "kirjosara" ;
tuodârkiäikkoo+Sem/Plant:tuodâr#kiäikko C_TAHHEE "tunturikohokki" ;
uccâšnjirgoo+Sem/Ani-bird:uccâ#šnjirgo C_TAHHEE "" ;
áimupoccee+Sem/Obj:áimu#pocce C_TAHHEE "ilmaputki" ;
čapismeerâkaijuu+Sem/Ani-bird:čapismeerâ#kaiju C_TAHHEE "mustanmerenlokki" ;
čuhâpođâšširree+Sem/Ani-bird:čuhâpođâš#širre C_TAHHEE "suippopyrstösirri " ;
